Washington statutes.
RCW 18.235.210

Application of chapter—January 1, 2003.

(1) This chapter applies to any conduct, acts, or conditions occurring on or after January 1, 2003.

(2) This chapter does not apply to or govern the construction of and disciplinary action for any conduct, acts, or conditions occurring prior to January 1, 2003. The conduct, acts, or conditions must be construed and disciplinary action taken according to the provisions of law existing at the time of the occurrence in the same manner as if this chapter had not been enacted.

(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, this chapter applies to applications for licensure made on or after January 1, 2003.

[ 2007 c 256 s 21; 2002 c 86 s 122.]